New Jersey, session 221, S741.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  The Legislature finds and declares that: a.  The Holland Tunnel Service Garage is a parcel that sits in Jersey City outside the entrance to the Holland Tunnel, owned by the Department of the Treasury and maintained by the Port Authority of New York and New Jersey (PANYNJ); b.  The PANYNJ has controlled this property since 1931 via legislation enacted concerning Bridge and Tunnel Unifications, P.L.1931, c.4; c.  Legislative Committee notes indicate vesting of jurisdiction over the property with the PANYNJ in 1931, and a property map shows the area under PANYNJ jurisdiction as early as 1965; however, there is no evidence that a deed was ever recorded conferring title to the PANYNJ; d.  The PANYNJ has exercised control over the Holland Tunnel Service Garage since its construction, and has assumed the payment of the original debt that was incurred at the time the facility was constructed in 1931; e.  Since 1931, the State has not exercised any indicia of ownership or control over the Holland Tunnel Service Garage and since that time has acted as if the PANYNJ has been the property owner; f.  The PANYNJ has been and will continue to be responsible for the monitoring, recordkeeping, reporting, and maintenance obligations for this property and any remediation action required because of the continued use and operation of the property; and g.  Consistent with the historical and ongoing responsibilities assumed by the PANYNJ with respect to the property, it is fitting and proper to legally transfer ownership of the property to the PANYNJ. 2.    a.  The Department of the Treasury is authorized to sell and convey, as surplus real property, all of the States right, title, and interest in and to the land and improvements thereon, known as the Holland Tunnel Service Garage, designated as Block 7203, Lot 2, in the City of Jersey City, County of Hudson, which has been declared surplus to the needs of the State.  The property shall be conveyed to the Port Authority of New York and New Jersey for 1[a price determined by the State House Commission] $11. b.    2[The] Notwithstanding the provisions of P.L.1962, c.220 (C.52:31-1.1 et seq.) or any other law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, the2 sale and conveyance authorized by subsection a. of this section shall 2[be executed in accordance with such terms and conditions as may be approved by the State House Commission] not require the approval of the State House Commission or any additional legislative approval2. 3.  This act shall take effect immediately.